Utah statutes.
61-2g-103.   Other law unaffected.

This chapter may not be considered to prohibit a person licensed, certified, or registered under this chapter from engaging in the practice of real estate appraising as a professional corporation or a limited liability company in accordance with:

(1)  Title 16, Chapter 11, Professional Corporation Act; or

(2)  Title 48, Chapter 2c, Utah Revised Limited Liability Company Act, or Title 48, Chapter 3a, Utah Revised Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, as appropriate pursuant to Section 48-3a-1405.



Amended by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

